Utah statutes.
10-1-108.   Cumulative powers -- Powers not in derogation of state agencies.

The provisions of this act or any other act not expressly repealed by Section 10-1-114 shall be considered as an alternative or additional power and not as a limitation on any other power granted to or possessed by municipalities.  The provisions of this act may not be considered as impairing, altering, modifying or repealing any of the jurisdiction or powers possessed by any department, division, commission, board, or office of state government.

